Wyoming statutes. Title 26 Insurance Code
Article 5. Health Care Reimbursement Reform

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1985, ch. 140, § 3, provides: “No provision of this act is repealed by any subsequent enactment of the legislature unless the enactment clearly indicates that repeal is intended.”

§ 26-22-501.
Short title.

This article is known and may be cited as the “Health Care Reimbursement Reform Act of 1985”.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 140, § 1.

§ 26-22-502.
Definitions.

As used in this article:

“Group” means any individual, partnership or corporation employing individuals in any occupation, or any labor union or other association representing such individuals if those individuals would qualify as an eligible group under W.S. 26-19-102(a)(i), (ii), (iii) or (viii) or any other number of individuals organized or united for a common purpose including any purpose specified in this article;

“Health care services” means health care services or products rendered or sold by a provider within the scope of the provider’s license or legal authorization and includes, but is not limited to, hospital, medical, surgical, dental, vision and pharmaceutical services or products;

“Insured” means an individual entitled to reimbursement for expenses of health care services under an agreement between a group and a provider or under a policy or subscriber contract issued or administered by an insurer;

“Insurer” means an insurance company or a health service corporation authorized in this state to issue policies or subscriber contracts which reimburse for expenses of health care services;

“Provider” means an individual or entity licensed or legally authorized to provide health care services.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 140, § 1; 1990, ch. 5, § 2; 1995, ch. 95, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 26-22-503.
Policies with incentives or limits on reimbursement authorized; conditions.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary:

Any provider may enter into a written agreement with any group or insurer relating to health care services which may be rendered to insureds, including amounts to be charged the insured for services rendered;

Any group or insured may contract with insurers to issue policies which:

Include incentives for the insured;

Limit reimbursement for health care services.

Before entering into any written agreement under paragraph (a)(i) of this section, the group or insurer shall establish terms and conditions to be required of any provider interested in entering into the agreement. In no event shall the established terms and conditions discriminate against any Wyoming provider nor shall any Wyoming provider willing to meet the established terms and conditions be denied the right to enter into any written agreement;

This section shall not be construed to expand the scope of coverage as defined by any agreement.

In no event may an insurer deny or limit reimbursement to an insured under this article on the grounds that the insured was not referred to the provider by a person acting on behalf of or under an agreement with the insurer.

Any group may contract with an insurer, preferred provider organization or health maintenance organization for provision of medical services outside of Wyoming for the insureds of that group, provided the insureds are not restricted from utilizing any Wyoming provider who provides the same health care services.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 140, § 1; 1990, ch. 110, § 1; 1993, ch. 55, § 1; 1995, ch. 95, § 1.

§ 26-22-504.
Refusal to contract or compensate for covered services.

An insurer shall not refuse to contract with or compensate for covered services an otherwise eligible health care provider solely because that provider has in good faith communicated with one (1) or more of his current, former or prospective patients regarding the provisions, terms or requirements of the insurer’s products as they related to the needs of that provider’s patients.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 166, § 1.

§ 26-22-505.
Dental insurance; limitation on fee schedules for noncovered services; definition; applicability.

No person or entity contracting with dentists to provide coverage or reimbursement for dental services shall require a dentist to provide services at a fee set by the contract, a policy or a certificate unless the services are covered services by the terms of the contract, policy or certificate.

For purposes of this section, “covered services” means services reimbursable under the contract, policy or certificate, subject to customary contractual limitations on benefits including such items as deductibles, waiting periods, frequency limitations or charges over the benefit maximum.

This section shall apply to contracts, policies or certificates issued, renewed, delivered or issued for delivery in this state on or after July 1, 2011.

History.

Laws 2011, ch. 107, § 1.

Effective date. —

Laws 2011, ch. 107, § 2, makes the act effective July 1, 2011.